Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256I.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1v. new text end new text begin Supplementary rate for certain facilities. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions 1a and 1c, beginning July 1, 2025, an agency shall negotiate a supplementary rate in addition to the rate specified in subdivision 1 for a housing support provider operating indoor communities with low barriers to access. The communities must: (1) be composed of individual secure, private dwellings for persons experiencing unsheltered homelessness with complex health needs including substance use disorder, serious mental illness, and physical health conditions; and (2) provide 24-hour-a-day supervision with on-site support services for 100 beds in the Twin Cities metropolitan area in a facility operating since 2020 and 48 beds in central Minnesota in a facility opening after 2025. The supplementary rate is not to exceed $975 per month, including any legislatively authorized inflationary adjustments. new text end